Washington statutes.
RCW 35.43.280

Settlement of Indian claims.

(1) The settlement of Indian land and other claims against public and private property owners is declared to be in the interest of public health and safety, orderly government, environmental protection, economic development, and the social well-being of the citizens of this state, and to specifically benefit the properties released from those claims.

It is the purpose of chapter 4, Laws of 1989 1st ex. sess. to encourage the settlement of such Indian land and other claims lawsuits by permitting the establishment and use of local improvement districts to finance all or a portion of the settlement costs of such lawsuits.

(2) A local improvement district may be established by a local government legislative authority to finance all or part of the settlement costs in an Indian land and other claims settlement related to public and private property located within the local government. The settlement of an Indian land claim lawsuit shall be deemed to be an improvement that may be financed in whole or in part through use of a local improvement district.

Except as expressly provided in this section, all matters relating to the establishment and operation of such a local improvement district, the levying and collection of special assessments, the issuance of local improvement district bonds and other obligations, and all related matters, shall be subject to the provisions of chapters 35.43 through 35.54 RCW. The resolution or petition initiating the creation of a local improvement district used to finance all or a portion of an Indian land and other claims settlement shall describe the general nature of the Indian land and other claims and the proposed settlement. The value of a contribution by any person, municipal corporation, political subdivision, or the state of money, real property, or personal property to the settlement of Indian land and other claims shall be credited to any assessment for a local improvement district under this section.

[ 1989 1st ex.s. c 4 s 2.]

NOTES:

Severability—1989 1st ex.s. c 4: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1989 1st ex.s. c 4 s 4.]